District of Columbia statutes.
35-212

Free transfer under reciprocal trackage agreement.

All street-railway companies within the District of Columbia on January 1, 1902, operating their systems, or parts of their systems, in the City of Washington by use of the tracks of 1 or more of such companies, under a reciprocal trackage agreement, which shall be compelled to discontinue the use of the tracks of another company, shall issue free transfers to their patrons from 1 system to the other at such junctions of their respective lines as may be provided for by the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1302, ch. 854, § 712
1981 Ed., § 44-212.
1973 Ed., § 44-212.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.